Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1121.
do enact as follows:SB1121,11Section 1. 49.45 (59m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1121,3,2249.45 (59m) Basic health plan. The department shall develop a plan and 3request a waiver, state plan amendment, or other federal approval to create a basic 4health plan that complies with 42 USC 18051. A basic health plan under this 1subsection shall provide coverage for individuals whose household income does not 2exceed 200 percent of the poverty line.SB1121,23Section 2. 49.471 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1121,3,12449.471 (4m) Purchase options for BadgerCare. (a) 1. The department 5shall request from the secretary of the federal department of health and human 6services any necessary waiver or amendment to the state Medical Assistance plan 7to establish a program that allows individuals with income above the maximum 8income eligibility limit applicable under this section or under s. 49.45 (23), and who 9otherwise meet the eligibility requirements under this section or under s. 49.45 10(23), the option of purchasing coverage through this section or through the 11demonstration project under s. 49.45 (23) instead of purchasing an individual 12health plan through private insurance.SB1121,3,16132. The department shall also seek any federal waiver and state Medical 14Assistance plan amendments necessary to allow individuals who qualify under 15subd. 1. to use advanced tax credits and cost-sharing credits, if eligible, to purchase 16one of the options described under subd. 1.SB1121,4,217(b) 1. The department shall coordinate the administration of the purchase 18options under this subsection with the programs under this section and s. 49.45 19(23) to maximize efficiency and improve the continuity of care, consistent with the 20requirements of this section and s. 49.45 (23). The department shall seek to 21implement mechanisms to ensure the long-term financial sustainability of the 22programs under this section and s. 49.45 (23). These mechanisms must address 23issues related to minimizing adverse selection, the state financial risk and 1contribution, and negative impacts to premiums in the individual and group 2insurance markets.SB1121,4,432. The purchase option program shall include, at a minimum, all of the 4following attributes:SB1121,4,65a. Establishment of an annual per enrollee premium rate similar to the 6average rate paid by the state to managed care plan contractors.SB1121,4,87b. Establishment of a benefit set equal to the benefits covered under this 8section and s. 49.45 (23).SB1121,4,109c. Annual enrollment that is limited to the same annual open enrollment 10periods established for the programs under this section and s. 49.45 (23).SB1121,4,1211d. The ability for the department to adjust the purchase option’s actuarial 12value to a value no lower than 87 percent.SB1121,4,1413e. Reimbursement mechanisms for addressing potential increased costs to the 14programs under this section and s. 49.45 (23).SB1121,4,1915(c) By March 1, 2027, the department of health services shall submit to the 16appropriate standing committee in each house of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) 17a report that provides information on the status of the request for a federal waiver 18and the results from actuarial and economic analyses that are necessary for a 19waiver proposal.SB1121,4,2220(d) The department shall include, in collaboration with the commissioner of 21insurance if necessary, an option for small groups of 50 employees or fewer to 22purchase coverage for group members under the program under this subsection.SB1121,5,523(e) If any necessary waiver or amendments to the state plan described under 1par. (a) 1. are approved, the department shall implement the program. If the 2department is authorized to implement the program, and if any waiver or state plan 3amendment described under par. (a) 2. is necessary and is approved, or if the 4department determines neither a waiver nor state plan amendment is necessary, 5the department shall allow the purchase options described under par. (a) 2.SB1121,36Section 3. 601.59 of the statutes is created to read:SB1121,5,77601.59 State-based exchange. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1121,5,88(a) “Exchange” has the meaning given in 45 CFR 155.20.SB1121,5,119(b) “State-based exchange” means an exchange that is described in and meets 10the requirements of 45 CFR 155.200 (f) and is approved by the federal secretary of 11health and human services under 45 CFR 155.105 (a).SB1121,5,1612(2) Establishment and operation of state-based exchange. The 13commissioner shall develop a plan to establish and operate a state-based exchange. 14The commissioner, in collaboration, as necessary, with the department of health 15services, shall ensure that individuals may access the ability to enroll in the 16purchase option program under s. 49.471 (4m) through the state-based exchange.SB1121,5,1917(3) Agreement with federal government. The commissioner may enter 18into any agreement with the federal government necessary to facilitate the 19implementation of this section.SB1121,5,2120(4) Rules. The commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to implement 21this section.SB1121,5,2222